nb: Kryddervariant: Saltlakemiks; Spekemiks; Tørr-rub; Dukkah; Furikake; Jerky-sett; Marinademiks; Popkornkrydder; Riskrydder; Våt-rub; Annet
th: เครื่องปรุงรสหลากหลาย: ส่วนผสมน้ำเกลือ; ส่วนผสมหมัก; เครื่องเทศหมักแห้ง; ดุกกะฮ์; ฟุริคาเคะ; ชุดทำเนื้อแดดเดียว; ส่วนผสมน้ำหมัก; ผงปรุงรสป๊อปคอร์น; ผงโรยข้าว; เครื่องเทศหมักเปียก; อื่นๆ
de: Gewürzart: Salzlaken-Mix; Pökel-Mix; Trockenmarinade (Dry Rub); Dukkah; Furikake; Jerky-Set; Marinaden-Mix; Popcorn-Gewürz; Reisgewürz; Nassmarinade (Wet Rub); Sonstige
pl: Odmiana przypraw: Mieszanka do solanki; Mieszanka do peklowania; Sucha marynata (rub); Dukkah; Furikake; Zestaw do suszonej wołowiny (jerky); Mieszanka do marynaty; Przyprawa do popcornu; Przyprawa do ryżu; Mokra marynata (pasta); Inne
tr: Baharat çeşitliliği: Salamura karışımı; Kürleme karışımı; Kuru baharat karışımı; Dukkah; Furikake; Kurutulmuş et kiti; Marine karışımı; Patlamış mısır baharatı; Pirinç baharatı; Islak baharat karışımı; Diğer
sv: Kryddsort: Rimningsblandning; Saltningsblandning; Torr rub; Dukkah; Furikake; Jerky-kit; Marinadmix; Popcornkrydda; Riskrydda; Våt rub; Övrigt
ru: Разновидность приправы: Смесь для рассола; Смесь для засолки; Сухая натирка; Дукка; Фурикаке; Набор для вяления мяса; Смесь для маринада; Приправа для попкорна; Приправа для риса; Влажная натирка; Другое
da: Krydderivariant: Saltlageblanding; Sprængningsblanding; Dry rub; Dukkah; Furikake; Jerky-sæt; Marinadeblanding; Popcornkrydderi; Riskrydderi; Wet rub; Andet
sl-SI: Sorta začimbne mešanice: Mešanica za razsol; Mešanica za soljenje; Suha marinada; Dukkah; Furikake; Komplet za sušeno meso; Mešanica za marinado; Začimbe za pokovko; Začimbe za riž; Mokra marinada; Drugo
ro-RO: Sortiment de condimente: Amestec pentru saramură; Amestec pentru conservare; Amestec uscat de condimente; Dukkah; Furikake; Kit pentru pastramă; Amestec pentru marinată; Condimente pentru floricele; Condimente pentru orez; Amestec umed de condimente; Altele
fi: Maustevalikoima: Suolavesiseos; Suolausseos; Kuivamausteseos; Dukkah; Furikake; Kuivalihapakkaus; Marinadiseos; Popcorn-mauste; Riisimauste; Märkämausteseos; Muu
el: Ποικιλία καρυκευμάτων: Μείγμα άλμης; Μείγμα παστώματος; Ξηρό μείγμα μπαχαρικών; Ντούκα; Φουρικάκε; Κιτ για παστό κρέας (Jerky); Μείγμα μαρινάδας; Καρύκευμα ποπ κορν; Καρύκευμα ρυζιού; Υγρό μείγμα μπαχαρικών; Άλλο
vi: Sự đa dạng về gia vị: Hỗn hợp muối chua; Hỗn hợp muối ướp; Gia vị ướp khô; Dukkah; Furikake; Bộ làm thịt khô; Hỗn hợp nước ướp; Gia vị rắc bắp rang; Gia vị rắc cơm; Gia vị ướp ướt; Khác
es: Variedad de condimento: Mezcla de salmuera; Mezcla para curar; Adobo seco; Dukkah; Furikake; Kit para carne seca; Mezcla para marinar; Condimento para palomitas de maíz; Condimento para arroz; Adobo húmedo; Otro
sk-SK: Rozmanitosť dochucovadiel (korenín): Zmes na nálev; Zmes na nakladanie; Suchá zmes korenia; Dukkah; Furikake; Súprava na sušené mäso (jerky); Zmes na marinádu; Korenie na pukance; Korenie na ryžu; Mokrá zmes korenia; Iné
zh-CN: 调味料种类: 盐水腌料; 腌制料; 干腌料; 杜卡调料; 香松; 肉干调料套装; 腌料/卤汁; 爆米花调料; 拌饭料; 湿涂料; 其他
fr: Variété d’assaisonnement: Mélange pour saumure; Mélange de salaison; Marinade sèche; Dukkah; Furikake; Kit pour viande séchée; Mélange pour marinade; Assaisonnement pour maïs soufflé; Assaisonnement pour riz; Marinade humide; Autre
zh-TW: 調味料種類: 鹽水混合料; 醃肉粉; 乾醃料; 杜卡香料; 香鬆; 肉乾製作套組; 醃料包; 爆米花調味粉; 拌飯香鬆; 濕醃料; 其他
pt-BR: Tempero variedade: Mistura de salmoura; Mistura de cura; Dry rub; Dukkah; Furikake; Kit para charque; Mistura para marinada; Tempero para pipoca; Tempero para arroz; Marinada em pasta; Outros
nl: Kruidenmix variant: Pekelmix; Zoutmix; Dry rub; Dukkah; Furikake; Jerky-kit; Marinademix; Popcornkruiden; Rijstkruiden; Wet rub; Overig
hr-HR: Raznovrsni začini: Mješavina za salamuru; Mješavina za sušenje; Suha marinada; Dukkah; Furikake; Komplet za sušeno meso; Mješavina za marinadu; Začin za kokice; Začin za rižu; Vlažna marinada; Ostalo
cs: Odrůda koření: Směs na lák; Nakládací směs; Suchá marináda; Dukkah; Furikake; Sada na sušené maso (jerky); Směs na marinádu; Koření na popcorn; Koření na rýži; Tekutá marináda; Jiné
ko: 양념 종류: 브라인 믹스; 큐어 믹스; 건식 럽; 두카; 후리카케; 육포 키트; 마리네이드 믹스; 팝콘 시즈닝; 밥 시즈닝; 습식 럽; 기타
it: Varietà del condimento: Miscela per salamoia; Miscela per stagionatura; Rub a secco; Dukkah; Furikake; Kit per carne essiccata; Miscela per marinatura; Condimento per popcorn; Condimento per riso; Rub umido; Altro
lt-LT: Prieskonių mišinio rūšis: Sūrymo mišinys; Konservavimo mišinys; Sausasis marinatas; Duka; Furikakė; Vytintos mėsos rinkinys; Marinato mišinys; Spragėsių prieskoniai; Ryžių prieskoniai; Šlapiasis marinatas; Kita
ja: 調味料の種類: ブラインミックス; キュアミックス; ドライラブ; デュカ; ふりかけ; ジャーキーキット; マリネミックス; ポップコーンシーズニング; ライスシーズニング; ウェットラブ; その他
hu: Fűszerezési fajtája: Páclé keverék; Érlelő keverék; Száraz pác; Dukkah; Furikake; Szárított hús készlet; Pác keverék; Pattogatottkukorica-ízesítő; Rizsízesítő; Nedves pác; Egyéb
en: Seasoning variety: Brine mix; Cure mix; Dry rub; Dukkah; Furikake; Jerky kit; Marinade mix; Popcorn seasoning; Rice seasoning; Wet rub; Other
pt-PT: Variedade de temperos: Mistura de salmoura; Mistura de cura; Marinada seca; Dukkah; Furikake; Kit para carne seca; Mistura para marinada; Tempero para pipocas; Tempero para arroz; Marinada húmida; Outro
bg-BG: Разнообразие от подправки: Смес за саламура; Смес за осоляване; Суха марината; Дука; Фурикаке; Комплект за сушено месо (jerky); Смес за марината; Подправка за пуканки; Подправка за ориз; Мокра марината; Други